Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-719
Appeal from district court; procedure; money on deposit; disposition.

Either condemner or condemnee may appeal from the judgment of the district court to the Court of Appeals in the manner provided by law for taking an appeal in a civil action. In case an appeal is taken either to the district court or the Court of Appeals, any money deposited by the condemner shall remain in the hands of the county judge until a final judgment is rendered except as provided in section 76-719.01.

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 19, p. 456;

Laws 1959, c. 351, § 3, p. 1241;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 137.